dictsource/qdb_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for 'lang belta' (conlang from The Expanse)

.replace
	á	'a
	é	'e
	í	'i
	ó	'o
	ú	'u
	à	'a
	è	'e
	ì	'i
	ò	'o
	ù	'u

.group '
	'	'

.group a
	a	a
	a (_A	a?
        

.group b
	b	b

.group c
	ch	tS

.group d
	dzh	dZ
	d	d

.group e
	e	e:
	e (_A	e:?

.group f
	f	f

.group g
	g	g

.group i
	i	i:
	i (_A	i:?

.group k
	k	k

.group l
	l	l
	l (_	u

.group m
	m	m

.group n
	ng	N
	ny	n^
	n	n

.group o
	ow	0
	ow (_A	0?
	o	o:
	o (_A	o:?

.group p
	p	p

.group r
	r	r

.group s
	sh	S
	s	s

.group t
	t	t
	t (_	?

.group u
	u	u:
	u (_A	u:?

.group v
	v	v

.group w
	w	w

.group x
	x	X

.group y
	y 	%j

.group z
	z	z

.group
	ã	A~	// we don't yet know if other nasalized vowels exist
